Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202671-8253
Act; how construed.

(1) If there are conflicts between the Statewide Trauma System Act and the Emergency Medical Services Practice Act pertaining to emergency medical services, the Emergency Medical Services Practice Act shall control.

(2) Nothing in the Statewide Trauma System Act shall limit a patient's right to choose the physician, hospital, facility, rehabilitation center, specialty level burn or pediatric trauma center, or other provider of health care services.

Laws 1997, LB 626, § 53;

Laws 2007, LB463, § 1305;

Laws 2020, LB1002, § 57.

Emergency Medical Services Practice Act, see section 38-1201.